Maryland, session 2026, HB1161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
10–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1161*

HOUSE BILL 1161
In this title, “Board” means the Board of Public Works.
10–208.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO THE FOLLOWING CATEGORIES OF
CONTRACTS AND AGREEMENTS SUBMITTED TO THE BOARD FOR ITS APPROVAL:
(1) ARCHITECTURAL AND ENGINEERING SERVICES CONTRACTS;
(2) CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTS;
(3) ENERGY PERFORMANCE CONTRACTS;
(4) GENERAL MISCELLANEOUS CONTRACTS;
(5) LANDLORD LEASE CONTRACTS;
(6) TENANT LEASE CONTRACTS;
(7) MAINTENANCE CONTRACTS; AND
(8) PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENTS.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE AN AGENCY TO PROVIDE, TO THE EXTENT
APPLICABLE, THE FOLLOWING CLIMATE AND SUSTAINABILITY INFORMATION ON
SUBMISSION OF A CONTRACT AWARD RECOMMENDATION OR PROPOSED
PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT TO THE BOARD:
(1) IF THE CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT CONTRIBUTES TO THE STATE’S
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION OR NET–ZERO CARBON GOALS, HOW
THOSE BENEFITS ARE ATTAINED;
(2) HOW THE CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT PROVIDES FOR RESILIENCE
AND ADAPTATION TO PROJECTED CLIMATE CHANGE AND EXTREME WEATHER
EVENTS OVER THE TERM OR THE USEFUL LIFE OF THE SUPPLIES OR SERVICES;
(3) HOW THE CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT ADVANCES THE STATE’S
GOALS AND LEADERSHIP ON CLIMATE MITIGATION, ADAPTATION, RESILIENCY, OR
INNOVATION FOR SUSTAINABLY SOURCED SUPPLIES OR SERVICES;
(4) WHAT PRODUCTS OR SERVICES IN THE CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT
ARE ENVIRONMENTALLY PREFERABLE, AS DEFINED BY THE MARYLAND GREEN
PURCHASING COMMITTEE UNDER § 14–410 OF THIS ARTICLE;

HOUSE BILL 1161 3
(5) HOW THE CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT INCORPORATES ASPECTS OF
DESIGN OR CONSTRUCTION THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE STANDARDS ADOPTED
BY THE MARYLAND GREEN BUILDING COUNCIL;
(6) HOW THE CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT FULLY COMPLIES WITH THE
HIGH PERFORMANCE BUILDING REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 3–602.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
AND
(7) HOW THE CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT IS CONSISTENT WITH THE
BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS FOR PROJECTS THAT WOULD BE
COVERED BY THE BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS UNDER § 2–1602
OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(C) THE LIAISONS TO THE BOARD FROM THE OFFICES OF THE GOVERNOR,
THE COMPTROLLER, AND THE STATE TREASURER SHALL ENSURE THAT THE
INFORMATION REQUIRED IN THIS SECTION APPEARS ON THE AGENDA OF THE
BOARD WHEN THE CONTRACT IS TO BE CONSIDERED.
(D) THE SECRETARY OF THE BOARD MAY EXEMPT CONTRACTS OR
AGREEMENTS FROM THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION IF THE SECRETARY
DETERMINES THAT THE REVIEW UNDER THIS SECTION IS NOT NECESSARY.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES SHALL ISSUE GUIDANCE TO
STATE AGENCIES ON COMPLYING WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.